New York, session 2025-2026, A4378.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3641-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3641-c. Grants for implementation of the seal of civic readiness 4 program. Beginning with state fiscal year two thousand twenty-five--two 5 thousand twenty-six, within the amount appropriated for such purpose, 6 the commissioner shall establish a program of competitively awarded 7 grants of fifty thousand dollars to no more than twenty applicant school 8 districts per year, for public schools that have successfully completed 9 both the seal of civic readiness application and commissioner created 10 grant application. Grants shall be awarded by the commissioner for exem- 11 plary applications that provide plans for the utilization of any combi- 12 nation of teaching and/or clerical staff, community partnerships, 13 professional development, curriculum and instructional design to carry 14 out the implementation of the seal of civic readiness program. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect April 1, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06741-01-5